North Dakota, session 69, SB2178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-02-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-02-12. Information contained and maintained in the central voter file.
The central voter file must contain the following information for each individual included in
the file:
1. The complete legal name of the individual.
2. The complete residential address of the individual.
3. The complete mailing address of the individual, if different from the individual's
residential address.
4. The unique identifier generated and assigned to the individual.
5. A status designation of the individual's eligibility to vote in a precinct.
6. The county, legislative district, city or township, school district, county commissioner
district, if applicable, precinct name, and precinct number in which the individual
resides.
7. Beginning in 2008, fourSix years of an individual's voting history, if applicable,
including the political party associated with a ballot furnished to the voter under section
16.1 - 11 - 22 .
8. Date of birth.
Page No. 1 25.0733.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
9. The individual's driver's license or nondriver identification card number issued by the
department of transportation, or the unique identifier from an official form of
identification issued by a tribal government to a tribal member residing in this state.
10. Any other information requested of and obtained from the individual deemed
necessary by the secretary of state for the proper administration of the central voter
file.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-02-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-02-15. Voter lists and reports may be made available for election-related
purposes - Funds received.
1. Except as otherwise provided by law, a voter list or a report generated from the central
voter file may be made available to a candidate, political party, or a political committee
for election-related purposes. Any information obtained by a candidate, political party,
or political committee for election-related purposes from a list or report generated from
the central voter file may not be sold or distributed for a purpose that is not
election-related. Except for information identified in the central voter file under
subsections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 10 of section 16.1-02-12, which may be made
available to a candidate, political party, or political committee for election-related
purposes, information in the central voter file is an exempt record.
2. An individual's record that is designated as "secured active" is an exempt record and
is not available to any candidate, political party, or political committee for any purpose,
except for information identified under subsections 1, 2, and 7 of section 16.1 - 02 - 12 .
3. Any funds received by the secretary of state to pay the cost of producing a report or
list of voters contained in the central voter file must be deposited in the secretary of
state's general services operating fund.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-03-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-03-21. Organizations allowed to nominate statewide and legislative candidates.
A political organization may not endorse candidates or have candidates petition for
president, vice president, Congress, statewide office, or legislative office as set forth in
chapter 16.1-11, unless the organization:
Page No. 2 25.0733.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
1. Organized according to all requirements of this chapter;
2. Had printed on the ballot at the last preceding general election the names of a set of
presidential electors pledged to the election of the party's candidate for president and
vice president, a candidate for governor, a candidate for attorney general, or a
candidate for secretary of state and those candidates for presidential electors,
governor, attorney general, or secretary of state received at least five percent of the
total vote cast for presidential electors, the office of governor, attorney general, or
secretary of state within this state at that election and organized according to all
requirements of this chapter; or
3. Filed a petition with the secretary of state signed by the number of electors required
under section 16.1-11-30 to qualify to endorse candidates or to have candidates
petition to be included on thea separate primary election ballot in a consolidated
column furnished under section 16.1 - 11 - 22 or on a special election ballot.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-07-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-07-05. Time for applying for ballot - Emergency situations - Sufficient time for
application and ballot return.
1. At any time in an election year, any qualified elector may apply to the county auditor,
the auditor or clerk of the city, or the business manager of the school district, as the
case may be, by personal delivery, facsimile, electronic mail or otherwise, for an
official ballot to be voted at that election. A voter may obtain an application form
approved by the secretary of state, for an absent voter's ballot for a general, special,
primary, county, city, or school election from the secretary of state, a county or city
auditor, a candidate, a political party, or a political committee. The application form
must provide the applicant the ability to indicate which elections in the calendar year
the applicant wishesdesires to vote by absentee ballot. If the individual requests a
primary election ballot issued under section 16.1 - 11 - 22, the application form mus t
provide the applicant the ability to indicate which primary election ballot the applicant
desires to vote by absentee ballot.
2. NoAn auditor or clerk may not issue ballots for absentee voters on the day of the
election except to individuals prevented from voting in person on the day of the
Page No. 3 25.0733.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
election due to an emergency. An individual requesting an absentee ballot on the day
of the election due to an emergency must do so through an agent as set forth in this
chapter. An agent may represent only one individual. The absentee ballot must be
returned to the county auditor's office by four p.m. on the day of the election.
3. A completed application must be submitted to the appropriate election official in a
timely manner so as to allow the applicant to receive, complete, and mail the absent
voter's ballot before the day of the election.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 16.1-07-06 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Application for an absent voter's or mail ballot must be made on a form, prescribed by
the secretary of state, to be furnished by the proper officer of the county, city, or school
district in which the applicant is an elector, or any form, approved by the secretary of
state, containing the following:
a. The applicant's name.
b. The applicant's current or most recent North Dakota residential address.
c. The applicant's mailing address.
d. The applicant's current contact telephone number, if available.
e. The election for which the ballot is being requested.
f. If applicable, the type of primary election ballot issued under section 16.1 - 11 - 22
the applicant desires to select.
g. The date of the request.
g.h. An affirmation that the applicant has resided, or will reside, in the precinct for at
least thirty days next preceding the election and will be a qualified elector of the
precinct.
h.i. The applicant's signature, a notification the signature on this affidavit will be
compared to the signature on the affidavit on the envelope in which the absentee
ballot must be placed.
i.j. The designation of the individual's status as a citizen of this country and resident
of this state living outside the United States, a uniformed service member living
away from the individual's North Dakota residence, or an immediate family
Page No. 4 25.0733.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
member of the uniformed service member living away from the individual's North
Dakota residence.
j.k. The applicant's date of birth.
k.l. The identification number from one of the applicant's valid forms of identification,
a copy of the applicant's long-term care certificate, and, if necessary, a copy of
the applicant's supplemental identification under section 16.1-01-04.1.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-11-10. Applicant's name placed upon ballot - Affidavit to accompany petition.
Upon receipt by the secretary of state of the petition or certificate of endorsement provided
for in section 16.1-11-06 accompanied by the following affidavit, the secretary of state shall
place the applicant's name upon the appropriate primary election ballot in the columns of the
applicant's party as provided or within the no-party office for which the applicant desires
nomination. Upon receipt by the county auditor of the petition provided for in section 16.1-11-11
accompanied by the following affidavit, the county auditor shall place the applicant's name upon
the appropriate primary election ballot within the no-party office for which the applicant desires
nomination. The affidavit may be filed electronically, through the mail, or by personal delivery.
However, the affidavit must be in the possession of the appropriate filing officer before four p.m.
on the sixty-fourth day before the primary election. If the affidavit is filed electronically, the
candidate shall retain the original copy. The affidavit must be substantially as follows:
State of North Dakota )
) ss.
County of ________ )
I, ______________, being sworn, say that I reside at ________________, in the city
of _______________, in the county of ______________ of North Dakota; and zip code of
________________; that I am a candidate for nomination to the office of _____________
to be chosen at the primary election to be held on _____________, ______, and I request
that my name be printed upon the primary election ballot as provided by law, as a
candidate of the ______________ party for said office. I am requesting that my name be
listed on the ballot as I have identified my ballot name below. I understand that nicknames
are allowed as part of my ballot name, but titles and campaign slogans are not permissible.
Page No. 5 25.0733.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
I have reviewed the requirements to hold office and I certify that I am qualified to serve if
elected.
_______________________________________
Ballot name requested
_______________________________________
Candidate's signature
Subscribed and sworn to before me on ______________, _____.
________________________________________
Notary Public
NOTARY SEAL My Commission Expires ____________________
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-11-12. Applicant's name placed on primary election ballot.
1. Upon receipt of the petition or certificate of endorsement provided for in section
16.1-11-06, accompanied by an affidavit as provided in section 16.1-11-10, the
secretary of state shall place the name of the applicant on the appropriate primary
election ballot infor the party or appropriate section if the documentation meets all
applicable requirements.
2. Upon receipt of the petition or certificate of endorsement provided for in section
16.1-11-11, accompanied by an affidavit as provided in section 16.1-11-10, the county
auditor shall place the name of the applicant on the appropriate section of the no-party
primary election ballot if the documentation meets all applicable requirements.
3. A candidate whose name was placed on the ballot under this section may have the
candidate's name removed from the ballot by submitting a written request to the
appropriate filing officer within forty-eight hours after the filing deadline under sections
16.1-11-06 and 16.1-11-11.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 6 25.0733.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
16.1-11-21. County auditor to publish sample primary election ballot and notice of
time and place of election.
The county auditor shall publish, once each week for two consecutive weeks before the
primary election, in the official county newspaper, and if noa newspaper is not published in the
county then, in a newspaper published in an adjoining county in the state, a notice
accompanied by a statement substantially the same as: "The arrangement of candidate names
on ballots in your precinct may vary from the published sample ballots, depending on the
precinct and legislative district in which you reside." The notice must include:
1. A copy of the sample ballotballots of the primary election, as arranged by order and
direction of the county auditor. The form of the sample ballot must conform in all
respects to the form prescribed for the sample primary ballotballots by the secretary of
state. The county auditor shall publish the sample ballotballots in all forms appropriate
for the method or methods of voting in the county. Candidates from each legislative
district that fallsfalling within the boundaries of the county must be listed in a separate
box or category within the sample ballot by legislative district number to enable the
voters in each legislative district to ascertain the legislative candidates in their specific
district.
2. The date of the primary election.
3. The hours during which the polls will be open.
4. The name and address for each polling place in the county.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-22 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-11-22. Primary election ballot - Form - Voters to vote for candidates of only one
political party.
At the primary election there maymust be only one ballot containing the a separate sections
for all parties or principlesballot for each political party entitled to ballot access under section
16.1 - 11 - 30. Each separate ballot also may contain a no - party election ballot as furnished under
section 16.1 - 11 - 24 and any city, county, or statewide measure to be voted upon at the primary
election. The judges and the inspector of elections shall inform each elector at the primary,
before voting, if the voter votes for candidates of more thanmust select one political party the
voter's political party ballot will be rejectedof the separate primary election ballots. The judges
Page No. 7 25.0733.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
and the inspector shall furnish the selected ballot to the voter and record which ballot was
furnished and the associated political party for inclusion in the central voter file under section
16.1 - 02 - 12. When the voter is furnished the selected ballot, the voter may not select a differen t
ballot issued under this section. TheEach separate ballot must be in the following form:
1. TheEach ballot must be entitled the "consolidated primary election ballot".
2. EachThe political party or principle having candidates at the primary election must
have a separate section on the ballot.
3. At the head of eachthe political party section must be printed the name of the political
party or principle which it represents.
4. Spanning the columns containing the political party ballot sections and before the
party names or principle titles must be printed: "In a Political Party Primary Election,
you may only vote for the candidates of one political party. This ballot contains the
number of political parties or principles and a description of where the political parties
or principles are to be found in the sections below. If you vote in more than one
political party's section, your Political Party Ballot will be rejected; however, all votes
on the No Party and Measure Ballots will still be counted."
5. Immediately below the warning against voting for candidates of more than one political
partyWithin the political party section of the ballot must be printed: "To vote for the
candidate of your choice, you must darken the oval next to the name of that candidate.
To vote for an individual whose name is not printed on the ballot, you must darken the
oval next to the blank line provided and write that individual's name on the blank line."
6.5. The offices specified in section 16.1-11-26 must be arranged in each section with the
name of each office in the center of eachthe political party section at the head of the
names of all the candidates for the office.
7.6. Immediately under the name of each office must be printed: "Vote for no more than
__________ name (or names)."
8.7. Immediately preceding and on the same line as the name of each candidate must be
printed an oval in which the voter is to mark the voter's choice by darkening the oval
next to the name of the candidate chosen.
9. The political party or principle which cast the largest vote for governor at the most
recent primary election at which the office of governor was voted upon must have the
Page No. 8 25.0733.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
first section, and the political party or principle casting the next largest vote must have
the second section, and so on.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-24 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-11-24. No-party primary ballot - Contents.
There must be a separate ballot at all primary elections which must be entitled "no-party
primary ballot". The names of aspirants for nomination to each office must be arranged on the
no-party primary ballot in separate groups in their order. The separate ballot may be on the
same paper or electronic ballot furnished under section 16.1 - 11 - 22 , but the list of offices and
candidates must be entitled "no-party primary ballot" in a manner to indicate clearly the
separation of the no-party list of offices and candidates from the party list of offices and
candidates. The names of all candidates for any of the offices mentioned in section 16.1-11-08
must be placed on the ballot without party designation. Immediately under the name of each
office must be placed the language: "Vote for no more than __________ name (or names)." The
number inserted must be the number to be elected to the office at the next succeeding general
election.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-26 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-11-26. Order in which names of offices shall appear on ballot.
TheEach primary election ballot for party nominations shallmust contain the following offices
in the following order underon each party columnseparate primary election ballot:
1. Congressional:
United States senator
representative in Congress
2. Legislative:
state senator __________ district
state representative __________ district
3. State offices:
governor and lieutenant governor
secretary of state
state auditor
Page No. 9 25.0733.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
state treasurer
attorney general
insurance commissioner
agriculture commissioner
public service commissioner
tax commissioner
SECTION 12. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-11-29. Preparation of ballot.
Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, theall primary election ballotballots must be
prepared as provided in chapter 16.1-06.
SECTION 13. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-30 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-11-30. Separate section on primary election ballot required for each political
party.
1. Any party that had printed on the ballot at the last preceding presidential election the
names of a set of presidential electors pledged to the election of the party's candidates
for president and vice president or a candidate for governor and those candidates for
presidential electors or governor received at least five percent of the total vote cast for
presidential electors or the office of governor within this state at that election; any party
that had printed on the ballot at the last preceding nonpresidential election a candidate
for attorney general or secretary of state, and the candidate received at least five
percent of the total vote cast for the office the candidate was seeking at the election;
or any party that has organized according to all the requirements of chapter 16.1-03
must be provided withis entitled to placement on a separate section on primary
election ballots ballot as described under section 16.1 - 11 - 22 .
2. Any other political organization is entitled to endorse candidates or have candidates
petition to be included on the primary ballot in a separate section of the consolidated
primary election ballot under section 16.1 - 11 - 22 , if a petition signed by at least seven
thousand qualified electors of this state is filed with the secretary of state before
four p.m. of the sixty-fourth day before a primary or special election, naming the
Page No. 10 25.0733.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
political organization, stating the platform principles of the party, and requesting the
names of its candidates to be included on the state's primary ballot in a separate
section. Political organizations that are granted ballot access under this section are
allowed ballot access only for those offices for which the organization has identified
candidates. Regardless of the means by which the petition is delivered, the original
must be in the possession of the secretary of state before four p.m. on the sixty-fourth
day prior to a primary or special election. Candidates of that party are entitled to the
same rights and privileges as those of other parties. Petitions circulated according to
this section must be filed with the secretary of state in accordance with section
1-01-50.
3. A political organization that had printed on the ballot at the last preceding presidential
election the names of a set of presidential electors pledged to the election of the
party's candidates for president and vice president or a candidate for governor and
those candidates for presidential electors or governor received at least five percent of
the total vote cast for presidential electors or the office of governor within this state at
that election, and any political organization that has printed on the ballot at the last
preceding nonpresidential election a candidate for attorney general or secretary of
state, and the candidate received at least five percent of the total vote cast for the
office the candidate was seeking at the election are entitled to organize according to
the requirements of chapter 16.1-03.
SECTION 14. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 16.1-11-39 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. Upon receipt of the documents filed by each candidate, the filing officer immediately
shall complete a thorough review of the documents and notify the candidate of any
necessary corrections that must be made before four p.m. on the sixty-fourth day
before the primary election. The filing officer may not place a candidate's name on
thea primary election ballot if the filed documents are insufficient and remain
uncorrected.
SECTION 15. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-40 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 11 25.0733.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
16.1-11-40. Primary election and ballot governed by general election provisions.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, theeach primary election ballot must be
arranged, and the primary election must be provided for, conducted, and the expenses thereof
paid as in the case of a general election.
SECTION 16. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-11.1-02. Application for mail ballots.
1. The county auditor shall mail an application form for a mail ballot to each active voter
listed in the central voter file for the county and each qualified individual eligible to vote
in the state for the first time on one date no sooner than the fiftieth day before the
election and no later than the fortieth day before the election. For all applications
mailed under this section for a primary election ballot issued under section 16.1 - 11 - 22 ,
the application form must provide the applicant the ability to indicate which primary
election ballot the applicant desires to vote.
2. The county auditor, for two consecutive weeks after the date on which the mail ballot
applications are mailed, shall publish in the official newspaper of the county an
application form for a mail ballot and a notice that additional mail ballot applications
may be obtained from the election official. The application form for a mail ballot must
be in substantially the form provided in section 16.1-07-06.
SECTION 17. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-12-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-12-02. Certificates of nomination by petition - Form and contents.
Certificates of nomination for nominees for an office to be filled at a general or special
election, except for an office appearing on the no-party ballot, may be made as provided by this
section. Except for nominees for president of the United States, names of nominees so
nominated must appear on the ballot as independent nominations. The names of nominees for
president of the United States may appear on the ballot with a designation, not to exceed five
words, that names the organization or political party to which the presidential candidate
affiliates. The designation may not falsely indicate an affiliation with or the support of any
political party organized in accordance with this title or include any substantive word or phrase
that is profane or that is already included in or resembles the name of a political party entitled to
Page No. 12 25.0733.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a separate columnballot under section 16.1-11-30 16.1 - 11 - 22 . Except for candidates for the
office of president of the United States, each certificate of nomination by petition must meet the
specifications for nominating petitions set forth in section 16.1-11-16. A political party or
organization desiring to submit to the secretary of state the name of a qualified candidate for the
office of the president of the United States may begin gathering the signatures for the certificate
of nomination on the first day of January of a presidential election year and shall submit the
petition to the secretary of state before four p.m. on the sixty-fourth day before the general
election. The signatures on the petition must be in the following number:
1. Except as provided in subsection 3, if the nomination is for an office to be filled by the
qualified electors of the entire state, there must be no fewer than one thousand
signatures.
2. If the nomination is for an office to be filled by the qualified electors of a district less
than the entire state, the number of signatures must be at least two percent of the
resident population of the district as determined by the most recent federal decennial
census, but in no case may more than three hundred signatures be required.
3. If the nomination is for the office of president, there must be no fewer than four
thousand signatures and the petition must contain the names of the presidential and
vice presidential candidates along with the names of the elector nominees and
alternate elector nominees for the office of the North Dakota presidential electors. The
elector nominees and alternate elector nominees must be qualified electors of North
Dakota.
4. If the petition is for the office of governor or lieutenant governor, it must contain the
names and other required information of candidates for both those offices.
Page No. 13 25.0733.01000